Utah statutes.
48-2a-204 (Repealed 07/01/13).   Execution of certificates.

(1)  Each certificate required by this chapter to be filed with the division shall be executed in the following manner:

(a)  an original certificate of limited partnership must be signed under penalty of perjury by all general partners;

(b)  a certificate of amendment must be signed under penalty of perjury by at least one general partner and by each other general partner designated in the certificate as a new general partner; and

(c)  a certificate of cancellation must be signed under penalty of perjury by all general partners.

(2)  Any person may sign a certificate by an attorney-in-fact, but a power of attorney to sign a certificate relating to the admission of a general partner must specifically describe the admission.



Enacted by Chapter 233, 1990 General Session 

Repealed by Chapter 353, 2011 General Session

